Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 13.1. Funding of Local Juvenile Facilities,
Programs and Certain
Court Service Units.

§ 16.1-322.1.
Apportionment of funds to localities or commissions operating juvenile secure detention facilities or programs; standards for apportionment.

The Department shall apportion among the localities or commissions operating a juvenile secure detention facility the moneys appropriated to the Department in the general appropriation act for the support of such facilities, excluding amounts approved for the state share of construction and rental of facilities, state ward per diem allowances, and payments for the United States Department of Agriculture lunch program. Such apportionment shall be made as follows:

The allocation shall be apportioned to provide each locality or commission operating a juvenile secure detention facility an allowance for salaries and expenses. Such allowance shall be at least equal to the amount of the allowance provided to each locality or commission for such salaries and expenses in the immediately preceding fiscal year for similar services. The Department may adjust such allowance, where applicable, for new programs and facilities or for discontinued programs and services.

The Department may reduce the apportionments made in accordance with this section from time to time if any facility fails to comply with Department policy or standards approved by the Board. In effecting such a reduction of funds, the Department shall not be required to comply with the provisions of Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2. Each locality or commission eligible to receive state funds apportioned under this section shall maintain operational and financial records which shall be open for evaluation by the Department and audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

The Governor may withhold approval for state expenditures, by reimbursement or otherwise, for the purposes set out in this section as provided in the current general appropriations act.

History.

1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1986, c. 394; 1995, cc. 698, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, cc. 698 and 840, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1996, if state funds are provided to carry out the purposes of this act during the 1995 Session of the General Assembly.” These funds were provided pursuant to Acts 1995, c. 853, item 578.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 422 D, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

16.1-322.1

of the Code of Virginia, the department shall apportion to localities the amounts appropriated in this Item.”

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendments by cc. 698 and 840 are identical, and in the introductory paragraph, substituted “secure detention” for “correctional”, deleted “or program” following “facility”, and deleted “programs and services” following “facilities”; in the second paragraph, deleted the former first sentence which read: “Three percent of the state funds available for apportionment under the provisions of this section shall be held in reserve to be distributed in the manner specified by §

16.1-322.2

”; in the present first sentence, substituted “allocation” for “balance”, substituted “secure detention” for “correctional”, and deleted “or program” following “facility”; deleted the former third and fourth paragraphs which pertained to the fixed amount of quarterly payments and the apportionment of remaining state funds; and deleted “or program” following “facility” in the present third paragraph. For effective date, see the Editor’s note.

§ 16.1-322.2.
Payment of funds quarterly; distribution and reallocation of reserve.

State moneys appropriated to the Department for the support of local juvenile secure detention facilities and apportioned in accordance with §

16.1-322.1

shall be paid to localities or commissions quarterly. If a local juvenile secure detention facility fails to comply with Department policy or standards adopted by the State Board, the next quarterly payment may be reduced and the difference paid into the general fund of the state treasury. In effecting such a reduction of funds, the Department shall not be required to comply with the provisions of Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

Any moneys distributed by the Commonwealth under this section which are unexpended at the end of each fiscal year within a biennium shall be retained by the locality or commission and subsequently expended for operating expenses of juvenile secure detention facilities. Any surplus funds remaining at the end of the biennium shall be returned to the state treasury.

The Governor may withhold approval for state expenditures, by reimbursement or otherwise, for the purpose set out in this section as provided in the current general appropriations act.

History.

1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1986, c. 394; 1995, cc. 698, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, cc. 698 and 840, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1996, if state funds are provided to carry out the purposes of this act during the 1995 Session of the General Assembly.” These funds were provided pursuant to Acts 1995, c. 853, item 578.

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendments by cc. 698 and 840 are identical, and substituted “secure detention facilities” for “correctional facilities” in three places; deleted “or programs” following “facilities” in two places; deleted the former second paragraph which pertained to the three percent of the apportionment held in reserve; in the present second paragraph, inserted “within a biennium” following “fiscal year” in the first sentence and added the second sentence. For effective date, see the Editor’s note.

§ 16.1-322.3.
Localities and commissions to make monthly reports to Director; penalty for willfully falsifying information; procedure when locality or commission fails to make report.

Each locality or commission eligible to receive state funds in accordance with the terms of this article shall report each month to the Director on blank forms furnished by the Department the number of child care days registered during the preceding month by each juvenile correctional program or facility operated by such locality or commission. Such report shall be signed by both the chief administrative officer of the facility or program and fiscal officer of the locality or commission who shall certify the accuracy of the report. Either signer found guilty of willfully falsifying the information contained in such report shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If any locality or commission fails to send such report within five days after the date when the report should be forwarded, the Director shall notify the chief administrative officer of such locality or commission of such failure. If the locality or commission fails to make the report within ten days from the date of such notice, then the Director shall cause the report to be prepared from the books of the locality or commission and shall certify the cost thereof to the Comptroller. The Comptroller shall issue his warrant on the Treasurer for that amount, deducting the same from any that may be due the locality or commission pursuant to §

16.1-322.2

by the Commonwealth.

History.

1983, c. 358.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 16.1-322.4.
Payments for children from other counties or cities.

Any locality or commission operating a juvenile secure detention facility may collect from any locality of this Commonwealth from which a child is placed in its facility a daily rate which does not exceed the sum total of the daily operating costs less any state aid for the purposes of construction and operation of such program. Daily cost shall be based on the cost of capital construction debt service and the cost of feeding, clothing, caring for, and furnishing medicine and medical attention for such child as may be agreed upon by the governmental units involved.

History.

1983, c. 358; 1995, cc. 698, 840; 1998, c. 856.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, cc. 698 and 840, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1996, if state funds are provided to carry out the purposes of this act during the 1995 Session of the General Assembly.” These funds were provided pursuant to Acts 1995, c. 853, item 578.

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendments by cc. 698 and 840 are identical, and combined the former first and second sentences into the present first sentence; substituted “secure detention facility” for “correctional program or facility”, deleted “program for” following “placed in its”, substituted “a daily rate which does not exceed the sum total of the daily operating costs” for “the reasonable cost of maintaining such child in such program or facility. Reasonable”; in the present second sentence, inserted “Daily” preceding “cost”, and deleted “or, in the absence of such agreement, the actual child care day cost, including depreciation, of operating the program or facility less state aid provided pursuant to §

16.1-322.2

or otherwise provided by the Department” following “by the governmental units involved.” For effective date, see the Editor’s note.

The 1998 amendment

added “less any state aid for the purposes of construction and operation of such program” in the first sentence and inserted “capital construction debt service and the cost of” in the last sentence.